District of Columbia statutes.
15-301

Definition and applicability.

As used in sections 15-302 , 15-303 , 15-305 to 15-307 , 15-309 , 15-317 , and 15-318 , “judgment” includes an unconditional decree for the payment of money, and sections 15-302 to 15-318 are applicable to such a decree.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 525, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(6)(B)
1973 Ed., § 15-301.
1981 Ed., § 15-301.